New Jersey, session 222, S2842.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 30 of P.L.1987, c.444 (C.38A:3-2b) is amended to read as follows: 30.  a.  The Division of Veterans' Healthcare Services shall supervise and operate the New Jersey Veterans' Memorial Home-Menlo Park, the New Jersey Veterans' Memorial Home-Vineland and the New Jersey Veterans' Memorial Home-Paramus. b.  The administrator and at least one assistant administrator at a State veterans' memorial home shall have prior experience in a clinical setting, including training or expertise in long-term care treatment. c.  The Department of Health and the Division of Veterans' Healthcare Services shall: (1)  require each State veterans memorial home to develop and implement an infection control and outbreak response plan; (2)  require all State veterans memorial home staff members to receive adequate training on proper hand hygiene, the usage of personal protection equipment, environmental cleaning, infection control, and outbreak management; (3)  conduct an annual financial audit of each State veterans memorial home; and (4)  perform at least one unannounced inspection of each State veterans memorial home each year to verify compliance with the provisions of this subsection. d.  As used in this section [, "clinical"]: Clinical means directly pertaining to the observation, diagnosis, treatment, or rehabilitation of an individual in a hospital, long-term care facility, rehabilitation center, or other similar facility and not through research. "Personal protective equipment" means any items commonly used to protect an individual from bacterial or viral infections, including, but not limited to, disinfecting wipes, disposable gloves, disposable gowns, face shields, N95 face masks, surgical masks, or parts thereof. (cf: P.L.2021, c.218, s.1.) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.